en: Tackle Bags & Boxes
xx: Tackle Bags & Boxes
cs: Rybářské batohy a tašky
da: Æsker og kasser til fiskegrej
de: Angelkästen & Angeltaschen
es: Cajas y bolsas de avíos
fr: Boîtes et sacoches de pêche
it: Borse e cassette per l'attrezzatura da pesca
ja: タックルバッグ・タックルボックス
nl: Viskoffers en -tassen
no: Fiskevesker og -bokser
pl: Torby i pojemniki na przynętę
pt: Maletas e caixas de pescador
ru: Сумки и коробки для рыболовных снастей
sv: Utrustningslådor för fiske
tr: Balıkçı Çantaları ve Kutuları

en: Golf
xx: Golf
cs: Golf
da: Golf
de: Golf
es: Golf
fr: Golf
it: Golf
ja: ゴルフ用品
nl: Golf
no: Golf
pl: Golf
pt: Golfe
ru: Гольф
sv: Golf
tr: Golf

en: Divot Tools
xx: Divot Tools
cs: Vypichovátka
da: Pitchforke
de: Pitchgabeln
es: Herramientas para chuletas
fr: Relève-pitch
it: Alza pitch
ja: ディボットツール
nl: Pitchforks
no: Greengaffel
pl: Narzędzia do naprawy darni
pt: Ferramentas divot
ru: Вилки для гольфа
sv: Gräslagare
tr: Çukur Düzeltme Aletleri

en: Golf Accessory Sets
xx: Golf Accessory Sets
cs: Sady příslušenství na golf
da: Golftilbehørssæt
de: Golf-Zubehörsets
es: Juegos de accesorios de golf
fr: Ensembles d'accessoires de golf
it: Set di accessori da golf
ja: ゴルフ小物セット
nl: Sets met golfaccessoires
no: Tilbehørssett for golf
pl: Zestawy do gry w golfa
pt: Conjuntos de acessórios para golfe
ru: Наборы принадлежностей для гольфа
sv: Golfkit
tr: Golf Aksesuar Setleri

en: Golf Bag Accessories
xx: Golf Bag Accessories
cs: Golfové pytle – příslušenství
da: Golftasketilbehør
de: Golftaschenzubehör
es: Accesorios para bolsas de golf
fr: Accessoires pour sacs de golf
it: Accessori sacche da golf
ja: ゴルフバッグ関連用品
nl: Golftasaccessoires
no: Tilbehør til golfbager
pl: Akcesoria do toreb golfowych
pt: Acessórios para sacos de golfe
ru: Принадлежности для сумок для гольфа
sv: Tillbehör till golfbagar
tr: Golf Çantası Aksesuarları

en: Golf Bag Carts
xx: Golf Bag Carts
cs: Vozíky na golfové pytle
da: Golftaskevogne
de: Golftaschentrolleys
es: Carritos para bolsas de golf
fr: Chariots pour sacs de golf
it: Carrelli per sacche da golf
ja: ゴルフバッグカート
nl: Golftaskarren
no: Golftraller
pl: Wózki na torby golfowe
pt: Carrinhos para transporte de sacos de golfe
ru: Тележки для гольфа
sv: Golfbagvagnar
tr: Golf Çantası Arabaları

en: Golf Bag Covers & Cases
xx: Golf Bag Covers & Cases
cs: Obaly a pouzdra na golfové pytle
da: Golftaskecovere
de: Golftaschenhüllen
es: Fundas para bolsas de golf
fr: Housses et protections pour sacs de golf
it: Coperture e astucci sacche golf
ja: ゴルフバッグカバー・ケース
nl: Golftashoezen en -houders
no: Trekk og omslag til golfbager
pl: Pokrowce na torby golfowe
pt: Capas e estojos para sacos de golfe
ru: Сумки и чехлы для мячей для гольфа
sv: Överdrag och fodral till golfbagar
tr: Golf Çantası Örtü ve Kılıfları

en: Golf Bags
xx: Golf Bags
cs: Golfové pytle
da: Golftasker
de: Golftaschen
es: Bolsas de golf
fr: Sacs de golf
it: Sacche da golf
ja: ゴルフバッグ
nl: Golftassen
no: Golfbager
pl: Torby golfowe
pt: Sacos de golfe
ru: Сумки для гольфа
sv: Golfbagar
tr: Golf Çantaları

en: Golf Ball Markers
xx: Golf Ball Markers
cs: Markovače míčků při golfu
da: Golfboldmarkører
de: Golfballmarkierungen
es: Marcadores para bolas de golf
fr: Marqueurs pour balles de golf
it: Pennarelli per palline da golf
ja: ゴルフボールマーカー
nl: Golfbalmarkers
no: Golfballmarkører
pl: Znaczniki piłek golfowych
pt: Marcadores de bola de golfe
ru: Маркеры для мячей для гольфа
sv: Markeringsbrickor för golfbollar
tr: Golf Topu İşaretleyicileri

en: Golf Balls
xx: Golf Balls
cs: Golfové míčky
da: Golfbolde
de: Golfbälle
es: Bolas de golf
fr: Balles de golf, Balle de golf
it: Palline da golf
ja: ゴルフボール
nl: Golfballen
no: Golfballer
pl: Piłki golfowe
pt: Bolas de golfe
ru: Мячи для гольфа
sv: Golfbollar
tr: Golf Topları

en: Golf Club Parts & Accessories
xx: Golf Club Parts & Accessories
cs: Součásti a příslušenství ke golfovým holím
da: Golfkølledele og tilbehør
de: Golfschläger-Teile & Zubehör
es: Accesorios y piezas para palos de golf
fr: Accessoires et pièces de clubs de golf
it: Parti e accessori mazze golf
ja: ゴルフクラブパーツ・関連用品
nl: Onderdelen en accessoires voor golfstokken
no: Deler og tilbehør til golfkøller
pl: Części i akcesoria do kijów golfowych
pt: Peças e acessórios para tacos de golfe
ru: Принадлежности и детали для клюшек для гольфа
sv: Delar och tillbehör till golfklubbor
tr: Golf Sopası Parça ve Aksesuarları

en: Golf Club Grips
xx: Golf Club Grips
cs: Gripy na golfové hole
da: Golfgrips
de: Golfschlägergriffe
es: Puños de palos de golf
fr: Poignées de clubs de golf
it: Impugnature mazze da golf
ja: ゴルフクラブ用グリップ
nl: Golfstokgrips
no: Golfkøllegrep
pl: Rękojeści kijów golfowych
pt: Punhos de tacos de golfe
ru: Ручки клюшек для гольфа
sv: Golfklubbgrepp
tr: Golf Sopası Gripleri

en: Golf Club Headcovers
xx: Golf Club Headcovers
cs: Headcovery
da: Overtræk til golfkøller
de: Golfschläger-Schutzhüllen
es: Protectores de palos de golf para cabezas
fr: Couvre-fers pour clubs de golf
it: Coperture per mazze da golf
ja: ゴルフクラブ用ヘッドカバー
nl: Hoezen voor clubhoofden van golfstokken
no: Trekk til golfkøllehoder
pl: Osłony na główki kijów golfowych
pt: Capas para cabeça de tacos de golfe
ru: Чехлы для битков клюшек для гольфа
sv: Golfklubbskydd
tr: Golf Sopası Uç Kılıfları

en: Golf Club Shafts
xx: Golf Club Shafts
cs: Shafty golfových holí
da: Skafter til golfkøller
de: Golfschlägerschäfte
es: Varillas de palos de golf
fr: Manches de clubs de golf
it: Canne per mazze da golf
ja: ゴルフシャフト
nl: Shafts van golfstokken
no: Golfkølleskaft
pl: Szafty do kijów golfowych
pt: Cabos de tacos de golfe
ru: Стержни для клюшек для гольфа
sv: Golfklubbskaft
tr: Golf Sopası Gövdeleri

en: Golf Clubs
xx: Golf Clubs
cs: Golfové hole
da: Golfkøller
de: Golfschläger
es: Palos de golf
fr: Clubs de golf, Club de golf
it: Mazze da golf
ja: ゴルフクラブ
nl: Golfstokken
no: Golfkøller
pl: Kije golfowe
pt: Tacos de golfe
ru: Клюшки для гольфа
sv: Golfklubbor
tr: Golf Sopaları

en: Golf Flags
xx: Golf Flags
cs: Golfové praporky
da: Golfflag
de: Golffahnen
es: Banderas de golf
fr: Fanions de golf
it: Bandierine da golf
ja: ゴルフフラッグ
nl: Golfvlaggen
no: Golfflagg
pl: Chorągiewki golfowe
pt: Bandeiras de golfe
ru: Флажки для гольфа
sv: Golfflaggor
tr: Golf Bayrakları

en: Golf Gloves
xx: Golf Gloves
cs: Golfové rukavice
da: Golfhandsker
de: Golfhandschuhe
es: Guantes de golf
fr: Gants de golf
it: Guanti da golf
ja: ゴルフグローブ
nl: Golfhandschoenen
no: Golfhansker
pl: Rękawice golfowe
pt: Luvas de golfe
ru: Перчатки для гольфа
sv: Golfhandskar
tr: Golf Eldivenleri

en: Golf Tees
xx: Golf Tees
cs: Golfová týčka
da: Golftees
de: Golf-Tees
es: Tees de golf
fr: Tees de golf
it: Tee da golf
ja: ゴルフティー
nl: Golftees
no: Golfpegger
pl: Kołeczki pod piłki golfowe
pt: Tees de golfe
ru: Стойки для мячей для гольфа
sv: Golfpeggar
tr: Golf Vuruş Noktaları

en: Golf Towels
xx: Golf Towels
cs: Golfové ručníky
da: Golfhåndklæder
de: Golfhandtücher
es: Toallas de golf
fr: Serviettes de golf
it: Asciugamani da golf
ja: ゴルフタオル
nl: Golfhanddoeken
no: Golfhåndklær
pl: Ręczniki golfowe
pt: Toalhas de golfe
ru: Полотенца для гольфа
sv: Golfhanddukar
tr: Golf Havluları

en: Golf Training Aids
xx: Golf Training Aids
cs: Golfové tréninkové pomůcky
da: Hjælpemidler til golftræning
de: Golf-Trainingshilfen
es: Material de aprendizaje de golf
fr: Outils d'entraînement pour le golf
it: Attrezzatura allenamento golf
ja: ゴルフ練習器具
nl: Benodigdheden voor golftraining
no: Golftreningsutstyr
pl: Artykuły treningowe do golfa
pt: Acessórios de treinamento de golfe
ru: Тренировочные приспособления для гольфа
sv: Träningshjälpmedel för golf
tr: Golf Antrenman Yardımcıları